Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1036
Attachment; intervening claimants; proceeding to ascertain title.

If personal property which has been attached be claimed by any person other than the defendant, it shall be the duty of the officer to have the validity of such claim tried, and such proceedings must be had thereon, with the like effect, as in case the property had been seized upon execution and claimed by a third person.

R.S.1867, Code § 231, p. 431;

R.S.1913, § 7765;

C.S.1922, § 8709;

C.S.1929, § 20-1036;

R.S.1943, § 25-1036.

Sheriff may bring suit hereunder to try claim of party to personal property attached by him. Leadabrand v. State, 121 Neb. 836, 238 N.W. 656 (1931).